California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 provide a written summary of these records to the appropriate committees of the Legislature and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California within 30 days after the enactment of the annual Budget Act.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to change the counties’ base allocations as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 17601.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 37.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5701.4.

Costs that were reimbursed, prior to July 1, 1991, from the local assistance appropriation contained in Item 4440-101-001 of the annual Budget Act, shall be reimbursed from funds received by counties pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 174.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5701.5.

City-operated Bronzan-McCorquodale programs paid by the state under Section 5615 shall be directly funded in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 174.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5702.

For the purposes of this part, the definition of maintenance of effort contained in Section 17608.05 shall apply.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 174.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5703.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a county, or counties acting jointly, from appropriating additional funds for mental health services. In no event shall counties be required to appropriate more than the amount required under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 174.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5704.

Funds described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5700 shall be deposited in the mental health account of the local health and welfare trust fund and shall only be used to fund expenditures for the costs of mental health services as delineated in regulations promulgated by the department, and shall not be used to fund expenditures for costs excluded by Section 5714 or for costs specifically excluded from funding from this source by any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 58.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5704.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that special consideration be given to children’s services in funding county services to expand existing programs or to establish new programs. 

(b) A county may not decrease the proportion of its funding expended for children’s services below the proportion expended in the 1983–84 fiscal year unless a determination has been made by the governing body in a noticed public hearing that the need for new or expanded services to persons under age 18 has significantly decreased.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 174.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5704.6.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), each county shall allocate for services to persons under age 18, 50 percent of the amount of any funding augmentation received for new or expanded mental health programs until the amount expended for mental health services to persons under age 18 equals not less than 25 percent of the county’s gross budget for mental health or not less than the percentage of persons under age 18 in the total population of the county, whichever percentage is less. Once achieved, this minimum ratio shall be maintained continuously thereafter. 

(b) As used in this section, the term “new or expanded mental health programs” does not include any programs which are required by statute, or programs which provide alternatives to hospitalization for patients of state hospitals. 

(c) From each funding augmentation for new or expanded mental health programs, a county may allocate to persons under age 18 an amount less than the percentage required in subdivision (a) when a determination has been made by the governing body in a noticed public hearing that the need for new or expanded services to persons under age 18 does not exist or is less than the need for services to one or more specified groups of adults.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 174.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5705.

(a) Negotiated net amounts may be used as the cost of services in contracts between the county and a subprovider of services. A negotiated net amount shall be determined by calculating the total budget for services for a program or a component of a program, less the amount of projected revenue. All participating government funding sources, except for the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of
 Division 9), shall be bound to that amount as the cost of providing all or part of the total county mental health program as described in the county performance contract for each fiscal year, to the extent that the governmental funding source participates in funding the county mental health programs. Where the State Department of Health Care Services promulgates regulations for determining reimbursement of mental health services allowable under the Medi-Cal program, those regulations shall be controlling as to the rates for reimbursement of mental health services allowable under the Medi-Cal program and rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries. Providers under this subdivision shall report to the State Department of Health
 Care Services and local mental health programs any information required by the State Department of Health Care Services in accordance with procedures established by the Director of Health Care Services.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
 division or Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000), absent a finding of fraud, abuse, or failure to achieve contract objectives, no restrictions, other than any contained in the contract, shall be placed upon a provider’s expenditure pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 141.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5706.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the portions of the county mental health services performance contract which become a contractual arrangement between the county and the department shall be exempt from the requirements contained in the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from approval by the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 174.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5707.

Funds appropriated to the State Department of Health Care Services which are designated for local mental health services and funds which the State Department of Health Care Services is responsible for allocating or administering, including, but not limited to, federal block grants funds, shall be expended in accordance with this section and
 Sections 5710 to 5717, inclusive, except when there are conflicting federal requirements, in which case the federal requirements shall be controlling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 142.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5709.

(a) A county shall not charge fees for Medi-Cal specialty mental health services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries who do not have a share of cost or Medi-Cal beneficiaries who have met their share of cost pursuant to Section 14005.9. Regardless of the funding source involved, a county may charge fees to individuals who are not Medi-Cal beneficiaries and Medi-Cal beneficiaries who have a share of cost that has not been met, in accordance with their ability to pay for community mental health services rendered, but not in excess of actual costs in accordance with Section 14708.

(b) This section shall not be construed to waive a county’s responsibility to screen for eligibility for Medi-Cal, any other insurance affordability program, or a county health
 program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 302.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5710.

(a) Charges for the care and treatment of each patient receiving service from a county mental health program shall not exceed the actual cost thereof as determined or approved by the Director of Health Care Services in accordance with standard accounting practices. The director may include the amount of expenditures for capital outlay or the interest thereon, or both, in his or her determination of actual cost. The responsibility of a patient, his or her estate, or his or her responsible relatives to pay the charges and the powers of the director with respect thereto shall be determined in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with
 Section 7275) of Chapter 3 of Division 7.

(b) The Director of Health Care Services may delegate to each county all or part of the responsibility for determining the financial liability of patients to whom services are rendered by a county mental health program and all or part of the responsibility for determining the ability of the responsible parties to pay for services to minor children who are referred by a county for treatment in a state hospital. Liability shall extend to the estates of patients and to responsible relatives, including the spouse of an adult patient and the parents of minor children. The Director of Health
 Care Services
 may also delegate all or part of the responsibility for collecting the charges for patient fees. Counties may decline this responsibility as it pertains to state hospitals, at their discretion. If this responsibility is delegated by the director, the director shall establish and maintain the policies and procedures for making the determinations and collections. Each county to which the responsibility is delegated shall comply with the policy and procedures.

(c) The director shall prepare and adopt a uniform sliding scale patient fee schedule to be used in all mental health agencies for services rendered to each patient. In preparing the uniform patient fee schedule, the director shall take into account the existing charges for state hospital services and those for community mental health program services. If the director determines that it is not practicable to devise a single uniform patient fee schedule applicable to both
 state hospital services and services of other mental health agencies, the director may adopt a separate fee schedule for the state hospital services which differs from the uniform patient fee schedule applicable to other mental health agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 145.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5713.

Advances for funding mental health services may be made by the Director of Mental Health from funds appropriated to the department for local mental health programs and services specified in the annual Budget Act. Advances made pursuant to this section shall be made in the form and manner the Director of Mental Health shall determine. When certified by the Director of Mental Health, advances shall be presented to the Controller for payment. Each advance shall be payable from the appropriation made for the fiscal year in which the expenses upon which the advance is based are incurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 706, Sec. 2.   (SB 1392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5714.

To continue county expenditures for legal proceedings involving persons with mental health disorders, the following costs incurred in carrying out Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of this division shall not be paid for from funds designated for mental health services.

(a) The costs involved in bringing a person in for 72-hour treatment and evaluation.

(b) The costs of court proceedings for court-ordered evaluation, including the service of the court order and the apprehension of the person ordered to evaluation when necessary.

(c) The costs of court proceedings in cases of appeal from 14-day intensive treatment.

(d) The cost of legal proceedings in conservatorship, other than the costs of conservatorship investigation as defined by regulations of the State Department of Health Care Services.

(e) The court costs in postcertification proceedings.

(f) The cost of providing a public defender or other court-appointed attorneys in proceedings for those unable to pay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 104.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5715.

Subject to the approval of the State Department of Health Care Services, at the end of the fiscal year, a county may retain unexpended funds allocated to it by the department from funds appropriated to the department, with the exception of block grant funds, exclusive of the amount required to pay for the care of patients in state hospitals, for 12 months for expenditure for mental health services in accordance with this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 149.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5717.

(a) Expenditures that may be funded from amounts allocated to the county by the State Department of Health Care Services from funds appropriated to the department shall include, salaries of personnel, approved facilities and services provided through contract, and operation, maintenance, and service costs, including insurance costs or departmental charges for participation in a county self-insurance program if the charges are not in excess of comparable available commercial insurance premiums and on the condition that any surplus reserves be used to reduce future year contributions; depreciation of county facilities as established in the state’s uniform accounting manual, disregarding depreciation on the facility to the extent it was financed by state funds under this part; lease of
 facilities where there is no intention to, nor option to, purchase; expenses incurred under this act by members of the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California for attendance at regular meetings of these conferences; expenses incurred by either the chairperson or elected representative of the local mental health advisory boards for attendance at regular meetings of the organization of mental health advisory boards; expenditures included in approved countywide cost allocation plans submitted in accordance with the Controller’s guidelines, including, but not limited to, adjustments of prior year estimated general county overhead to actual costs, but excluding allowable costs otherwise compensated by state funding; net costs of conservatorship investigation, approved by the Director of Health Care Services. Except for expenditures made pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 129225) of Chapter 1 of Part 6 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code, it shall not include expenditures
 for initial capital improvements; the purchaser or construction of buildings except for equipment items and remodeling expense as may be provided for in regulations of the State Department of Health Care Services; compensation to members of a local mental health advisory board, except actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties that may include travel, lodging, and meals while on official business; or expenditures for a purpose for which state reimbursement is claimed under any other provision of law.

(b) The Director of Health Care Services may make investigations and audits of expenditures the director may deem necessary.

(c) With respect to funds allocated to a county by the State Department of Health Care Services from funds appropriated to the department, the county shall repay to the state amounts found not to have been expended in accordance
 with the requirements set forth in this part. Repayment shall be within 30 days after it is determined that an expenditure has been made that is not in accordance with the requirements. In the event that repayment is not made in a timely manner, the department shall offset any amount improperly expended against the amount of any current or future advance payment or cost report settlement from the state for mental health services. Repayment provisions shall not apply to Short-Doyle funds allocated by the department for fiscal years up to and including the 1990–91 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 38.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Mental Health Master Plan Development Act [5730. - 5733.]

5730.

This act is to be known as the Mental Health Master Plan Development Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5731.

The Legislature finds and declares that the mental health system is a large and important segment of California’s system of health care. The Legislature further finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Public Law 99-660 requires that the State Department of Mental Health develop a state plan for the Short-Doyle mental health system which includes all of the following:

(1) Plans developed in response to federal planning requirements shall be submitted to the Legislature.

(2) Evidence of broad participation from concerned citizens and mental
 health consumers.

(3) An analysis of the needs of
 adults with a serious and persistent mental illness, children and youth with serious emotional disturbance, and persons who are homeless with a mental illness in California.

(4) Improvements in the mental health delivery system are needed for
 adults with a serious and persistent mental illness, children and youth with serious emotional disturbance, and persons who are homeless with a mental illness.

(5) Given the existing mental health funding base, priorities need to be established for the Short-Doyle community mental health system.

(6) There is no minimum range of treatment services which should be available in every county in California.

(7) Most funding formulas for state mental health programs are not client based.

(8) The state has a special responsibility for the care and treatment of adults with a serious and persistent mental illness, minors with serious
 emotional disturbance, and persons who are homeless with a mental illness who are the most vulnerable and who require consistent supportive services to meet their health and safety needs in the community.

(9) Legislative action is required to ensure that a comprehensive policy is developed which addresses the critical problems and key issues currently facing the mental health system in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 41.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5732.

(a) Given the requirements of Public Law 99-660 and the significant policy issues currently facing the mental health system in California, a master plan for mental health is required which integrates these planning and reform efforts and which establishes priorities for the service delivery system and analyzes critical policy issues.

(b) The California Planning Council’s scope shall be expanded to include the development of the Mental Health Master Plan. This Mental Health Master Plan shall be distinct but compatible with the plan mandated by Public Law 99-660, the development and implementation of which is the responsibility of the State Department of Mental Health.

(c) Therefore, the California Planning Council required by Public Law 99-660 shall be expanded to include the following members:

(1) The Speaker of the Assembly shall recommend to the Governor for appointment, one council member.

(2) The Assembly Minority Floor Leader shall recommend to the Governor for appointment, one council member.

(3) The President pro Tempore of the Senate shall recommend to the Governor for appointment, one council member.

(4) The Senate Minority Floor Leader shall recommend to the Governor for appointment, one council member.

(5) The County Supervisors Association of California shall recommend to the Governor for appointment, one council member.

(d) The Mental Health Master Plan shall be completed and submitted to the Legislature and the Governor by October 1, 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5733.

The Mental Health Master Plan shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of all of the following:

(a) The specific planning elements required by Public Law 99-660.

(b) Identification of priority populations to be served and a definition of those priority populations.

(c) Proposed methods of allocating resources which result in the most effective system of care possible for the priority populations.

(d) Proposed methods of evaluating the effectiveness of current service delivery methods and the populations which are best served by these models of care.

(e) Recommendations related to the governance and responsibilities of the state, county, or other administrative structures for the delivery of mental health programs which are cost-effective and provide the highest quality of care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Operation and Administration [5750. - 5772.]

5750.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall administer this part and shall adopt standards for the approval of mental health services, and rules and regulations necessary thereto. However, these standards, rules, and regulations shall be adopted only after consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California and the California Behavioral Health Planning Council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 10.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5751.

(a) Regulations pertaining to the qualifications of directors of local mental health services shall be administered in accordance with Section 5607. These standards may include the maintenance of records of service which shall be reported to the State Department of Health Care Services in a manner and at times as it may specify.

(b) Regulations pertaining to the position of director of local mental health services, where the local director is other than the local health officer or medical administrator of the county hospitals, shall require that the director be a
 psychiatrist, psychologist, clinical social worker, marriage and family therapist, professional clinical counselor, registered nurse, or hospital administrator, who meets standards of education and experience established by the Director of Health Care Services. Where the director is not a psychiatrist, the program shall have a psychiatrist licensed to practice medicine in this state and who shall provide to patients medical care and services as authorized by Section 2051 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) The regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 163.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5751.1.

Regulations pertaining to the position of director of local mental health services, where the local director is other than the local health officer or medical administrator of the county hospitals, shall require that the director meet the standards of education and experience established by the Director of Health Care Services and that the appointment be open on the basis of competence to all eligible disciplines pursuant to Section 5751. Regulations pertaining to the qualifications of directors of local mental health services shall be administered in accordance with Section 5607.

Where the director of local mental health services is not a psychiatrist, the program shall have a psychiatrist licensed to practice medicine in this state and who shall provide to patients medical care and services as authorized by Section 2137 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 164.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5751.2.

(a) Except as provided in this section, persons employed or under contract to provide mental health services pursuant to this part, or pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 14680) of Chapter 8.8 of, or Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700) of, Part 3 of Division 9, shall be subject to all applicable requirements of law regarding professional licensure, and no person shall be employed in local mental health programs pursuant to this part to provide services for which a license is required, unless the person possesses a valid license.

(b) Persons employed as psychologists and clinical social workers, while continuing in their employment in the same class as of January 1, 1979, in the same program or facility, including those persons on authorized
 leave, but not including intermittent personnel, shall be exempt from the requirements of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) While registered with the licensing board of jurisdiction for the purpose of acquiring the experience required for licensure, persons employed or under contract to provide mental health services pursuant to this part, or pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 14680) of Chapter 8.8 of, or Chapter 8.9 (Commencing with Section 14700) of, Part 3 of Division 9, as clinical social workers, marriage and family therapists, or professional clinical counselors shall be exempt from subdivision (a). Registration shall be subject to regulations adopted by the appropriate licensing board.

(2) For the purposes of this paragraph, “experience required for licensure” means experience that satisfies the requirements of Section 4996.23, 4980.43, or 4999.46 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) (1) The requirements of subdivision (a) shall be waived by the State Department of Health Care Services for persons employed or under contract to provide mental health services as psychologists pursuant to this part, or pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 14680) of Chapter 8.8 of, or Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700) of, Part 3 of Division 9, who are gaining the experience required for licensure. A
 waiver granted under this subdivision shall not exceed five years from the date of employment by, or contract with, a local mental health program for persons in the profession of psychology.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “experience required for licensure” means experience that satisfies the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 2914 of the Business and Professions Code.

(e) The requirements of subdivision (a) shall be waived by the State Department of Health Care Services for persons employed or under contract to provide mental health services as psychologists, clinical social workers, marriage and family therapists, or professional clinical counselors pursuant to this part, or pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 14680) of Chapter 8.8 of, or
 Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700) of, Part 3 of Division 9, who have been recruited for employment from outside this state and whose experience is sufficient to gain admission to a licensing examination. A waiver granted under this subdivision shall not exceed five years from the date of employment by, or contract with, a local mental health program for persons in these four professions who are recruited from outside this state.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time that regulations are adopted.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations on or
 before December 31, 2020, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 279, Sec. 3.   (AB 2253)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5751.7.

(a) For the purposes of this part and the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000)), the State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of State Hospitals shall ensure that, whenever feasible, minors shall not be admitted into psychiatric treatment with adults if the health facility has no specific separate housing arrangements, treatment staff, and treatment programs designed to serve children or adolescents. The Director of Health Care Services shall provide waivers to counties, upon their request, if this policy creates undue hardship in any county due to inadequate or unavailable alternative resources. In granting the waivers, the Director of Health Care Services shall require the county to establish specific treatment protocols and
 administrative procedures for identifying and providing appropriate treatment to minors admitted with adults.

(b) However, notwithstanding any other provision of law, no minor may be admitted for psychiatric treatment into the same treatment ward as any adult receiving treatment who is in the custody of any jailor for a violent crime, is a known registered sex offender, or has a known history of, or exhibits inappropriate, sexual, or other violent behavior which would present a threat to the physical safety of minors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 46.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5755.1.

The state mental health plan shall be submitted to the California Council on Mental Health and the Advisory Health Council or its successor for review and recommendations as to conformance with California’s comprehensive statewide health plan. The state mental health plan shall be submitted for review and recommendations prior to amendments or changes thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1232, Sec. 29.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5767.

The department, in consultation with a statewide organization representing county mental health services, shall strengthen and ensure statewide application of managed care principles, building on existing county systems, to manage the Early Periodic Screening Diagnosis and Treatment Program benefit while ensuring access to eligible Medi-Cal recipients.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 36.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5768.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as to requirements relating to fire and life safety of persons with mental illness, the State Department of Health Care Services, in its discretion, may permit new programs to be developed and implemented without complying with licensure requirements established pursuant to existing state law.

(b) Any program developed and implemented pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be reviewed at least once each six months, as determined by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(c) The State Department of Health Care Services may establish appropriate licensing requirements for these new programs upon a
 determination that the programs should be continued.

(d) Within six years, any program shall require a licensure category if it is to be continued. However, in the event that any agency other than the State Department of Health Care Services is responsible for developing a licensure category and fails to do so within the six years, the program may continue to be developed and implemented pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) until such time that the licensure category is established.

(e) (1) A nongovernmental entity proposing a program shall submit a program application and plan to the local mental health director that describes at least the following components: clinical treatment programs, activity programs, administrative policies and procedures, admissions, discharge planning, health records content, health records service, interdisciplinary treatment
 teams, client empowerment, patient rights, pharmaceutical services, program space requirements, psychiatric and psychological services, rehabilitation services, restraint and seclusion, space, supplies, equipment, and staffing standards. If the local mental health director determines that the application and plan are consistent with local needs and satisfactorily address the above components, he or she may approve the application and plan and forward them to the department.

(2) Upon the State Department of Health Care Services’ approval, the local mental health director shall implement the program and shall be responsible for regular program oversight and monitoring. The department shall be notified in writing of the outcome of each review of the program by the local mental health director, or his or her designee, for compliance with program requirements. The department shall retain ultimate responsibility for approving the method for review of
 each program, and the authority for determining the appropriateness of the local program’s oversight and monitoring activities.

(f) Governmental entities proposing a program shall submit a program application and plan to the State Department of Health Care Services that describes at least the components described in subdivision (e). Upon approval, the department shall be responsible for program oversight and monitoring.

(g) Implementation of a program shall be contingent upon the State Department of Health Care Services’ approval, and the department may reject applications or require modifications as it deems necessary. The department shall respond to each proposal within 90 days of receipt.

(h) The State Department of Health Care Services shall submit an evaluation to the Legislature of all pilot projects authorized
 pursuant to this section within five years of the commencement of operation of the pilot project, determining the effectiveness of that program or facility, or both, based on, but not limited to, changes in clinical indicators with respect to client functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 47.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5768.5.

(a) When a mental health patient is being discharged from any facility authorized under Section 5675 or 5768, the patient and the patient’s conservator, guardian, or other legally authorized representative shall be given a written aftercare plan prior to the patient’s discharge from the facility. The written aftercare plan shall include, to the extent known, the following components:

(1) The nature of the illness and followup required.

(2) Medications, including side effects and dosage schedules. If the patient was given an informed consent form with his or her medications, the form shall satisfy the requirement for information on side effects of the medications.

(3) Expected course of recovery.

(4) Recommendations regarding treatment that are relevant to the patient’s care.

(5) Referrals to providers of medical and mental health services.

(6) Other relevant information.

(b) The patient shall be advised by facility personnel that he or she may designate another person to receive a copy of the aftercare plan. A copy of the aftercare plan shall be given to any person designated by the patient.

(c) For purposes of this section, “mental health patient” means a person who is admitted to the facility primarily for the diagnosis or treatment of a mental disorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 200.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5769.

Whenever the director determines that a county’s personnel regulations and procedures are impediments to the timely implementation of programs developed and implemented pursuant to Section 5768, the director shall communicate such determination to the governing body of such county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1105.)
-------------------------------------------

5770.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Department of Health Care Services may directly, or by contract, with any public or private agency, provide any of the services under this division when the state determines that the services are necessary to protect the public health, safety, or welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 168.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5770.5.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall encourage county mental health programs to develop and support local programs designed to provide technical assistance to self-help groups for the purposes of maintaining existing groups, as well as to stimulate development of new self-help groups from locally defined needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 169.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5771.

(a) Pursuant to Public Law 102-321, there is the California Behavioral Health Planning Council. The purpose of the planning council shall be to fulfill those mental health planning requirements mandated by federal law.

(b) (1) The planning council shall have 40 members, to be comprised of members appointed from both the local and state levels in order to ensure a balance of state and local concerns relative to planning.

(2) As required by federal law, eight members of the planning council shall represent various state departments.

(3) Members of the planning council shall be appointed in a manner that will ensure that at least one-half are adults with serious mental illness, including persons who are dually diagnosed with serious mental illness and substance use disorders, family members of persons with serious mental illness, including adults who are dually diagnosed with serious mental illness and substance use disorders, family members of children with emotional disturbance, and representatives of organizations advocating on behalf of persons with mental illness, including persons who are dually diagnosed with mental illness and substance use disorders. Persons with serious mental illness, including persons who are dually diagnosed with serious mental illness and substance use disorders, and family members shall be represented in equal numbers.

(4) The
 Director of Health Care Services shall make appointments from among nominees from various constituency organizations for mental health or mental health and substance use disorders, which shall include representatives of consumer-related advocacy organizations, representatives of professional and provider organizations for mental health or mental health and substance use disorders, and representatives who are direct service providers from both the public and private sectors. The director shall also appoint one representative of the California Coalition on Mental Health. The director shall also appoint the Executive Director of the California Commission on Aging or the executive director’s designee.

(c) Members should be balanced according to demography, geography, gender, and ethnicity. Members should include representatives with